src/fst/phonology.twolc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no
!
! Main development by Joshua Wilbur (joshua.wilbur@ut.ee)

!! # Pite Sámi TWOLC file
!
! $Id$
!
!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sje/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 


Alphabet
  a b c d e f g h i ï j k l m n ŋ o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å
  A B C D E F G H I   J K L M N Ŋ O P Q R S T U V w X Y Z Æ Ä Ø Ö Å
  á é í 
  Å Ä Ö Ø Æ Á
  Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð
  á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ª %- ß
  i2:i u2:u ä2:ä
  b2:b d2:d g2:g t2:t j2:j
  %^O:o
  ':0

  %^WG:0     !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  weak grade
  %^G3:0     !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  marks grade three for stems w/o Cgrad
  %^V2E2AA:0 !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  e to á in V2 (e.g. ILL.SG, DIM, 1/2-Sg)
  %^V2O2U:0 !!= @CODE@ * o to u in V2 (e.g. Ill.Sg, Dim, some N_ODD) etc.
  %^CDEL:0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  delete final consonant odd (biednag)
  %^VDEL:0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  delete final V2 vowel in compounds or gájk
  %^MON:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  Monophthong in contracted stems
  %^UAUML:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  uo to uä juolge / juällge
  %^IEUML:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  ie to ä, gielbar / gällbara
  %^IUML:0   !!= @CODE@ * a to i, gallgat gillgin
  %^IJ:0     !!= @CODE@ * e to i in front of Plural j and Sg Com
  %^MONB4J:0 !!= @CODE@ * what is this?

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

! Morpheme boundaries:
 «    ! Derivational prefix
 »    ! Derivational suffix
 %<:0 ! Inflectional prefx
 %>:0 ! Inflectional suffix
 #    ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 %^   ! (exceptional) soft hyphenation point

! End of alphabet definitions
;

Sets
  Letter = a b c d e f g h i ï j k l m n ŋ o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å á é í ó ú ' ;
  Cns    =   b c d   f g h     j k l m n ŋ   p q r s t   v w x   z                     '
      		 B C D   F G H     J K L M N Ŋ   P Q R S T   V W X   Z
             b2 d2 g2 t2 j2 ;
  Vow    = a       e       i ï             o           u       y   æ ä ø ö å á é í ó ú 
           A       E       I               O           U           Æ Ä Ø Ö Å Á É Í Ó Ú 
                           i2              %^O         u2            ä2 ;
  Dummy  =  %^WG %^G3 %^V2E2AA %^V2O2U %^CDEL %^VDEL %^MON %^UAUML %^IEUML %^IUML %^IJ ; 
  
Definitions

 G3 = [ b b n j |
        b b t [j|s] |
        d d n j |
        h t t [j|s] |
        j j s t |
        j j t s |
        j j t j |
        k k s [j|t] |
        k k t [j|s] |
        l d n j |
        l l t [j|s] |
        m m s [j|t] |
        n n j g |
        n n s [k|t] |
        n n t [j|s] |
        p p t [j|s] |
        r r s j |
        r r t [j|s] |
        s s j k |
        s s j m |
        v d n j |
        v v d n |
        v v s [j|k] |
        v v t [j|s] |

        f ':0 f |
        l ':0 l |
        m ':0 m |
        n ':0 n |
        ŋ ':0 ŋ |
        r ':0 r |
        s ':0 s |
        v ':0 v |
        s ':0 s j |

        b b [d|j|l|m|n|r] |
        b d n |
        d d [g|j|m|n|v] |
        f f [t|n] |
        g g d |
        g g ŋ |
        h [k k|p p|t t] |
        j j [b|d|g|k|l|p|r|s|t|v] |
        j b m |
        j d n | 
        k k [n|s|t] |
        l l [b|f|g|k|p|s|v] |
        l b m |
        l d j |
        l d n |
        l l [d|j|t] |
        m m [b|g|p|s] |
        n n [d|t] |
        ŋ ŋ [g|k|n] |
        p p [k|s|t] |
        r r [b|d|f|g|j|k|s|t|v] |
        r d j |
        s s [k|m|n|ŋ|p|t] |
        t t k |
        v v [d|g|j|k|l|r|s] |
        v d n ] ;

 noCG = [ 
        b b |
        d d |
        d t [j|s] |
        g g |
        r b m |
        r d n |
        r d n j |
        r g ŋ |
        l g ŋ ] ; ! for consonant centers with 3+ characters that do NOT alternate

 VHtrig = [
        e:i |
        i   |
        o:u |
        u
        ] ; !vowels that trigger VH (does NOT include i2 and u2)


 noVHtrig = [
        a:a | 
        á:á | 
        e:á | 
        e:e | 
        o:o | 
        y:y | 
        i2:i | 
        u2:u | 
        ä2:ä |
        %^O:o
        ] ; !vowels that do NOT trigger VH

 V2E2AAtrig = [
        v |
        j |
        t j
        ] ; !consonants (incl. digraphs) which can occur before ^V2E2AA

!! # Rules

Rules
 
 
!! ## Consonant gradation rules

"Consonant Gradation for htt(j|s):ht(j|s)"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
t:0 <=> Vow: h t _ ( j | s ) (Vow:+) (Cns:+) ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;

"Consonant Gradation for hxx:hx"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:0 <=> Vow: h Cx _ (Vow:+) (Cns:+) ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
     where Cx in (p k) ; ! 't' covered by "Consonant Gradation for htt(j|s):ht(j|s)"

"Consonant Gradation for xdn(j):xn(j)"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
d:0 <=> Vow: j _ n (j) Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
		Vow: v _ n (j) Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
		Vow: l _ n (j) Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
		Vow:   _ n  j  Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ; ! ladnja<->lanja; ganjal<->gadnjala

!		[#|.#.] Cns:+ Vow: _ n j Vow: Cns: %^WG: ;

! !!€ jalgŋe^WGs>0
! !!€ jalgŋe0s00
! !!€ jalgŋá>v
! !!€ jalgŋá0v

! !!€ gållmes^WG>0
! !!€ gå0lmes^WG>0

! !!€ #ádnjas^WG#
! !!€ #á0njas0#
! !!€ #ádnjasa>v#
! !!€ #ádnjasa0v#
! !!€ #gadnjal^WG#
! !!€ #ga0njal0#
! !!€ #vu^Onjes^WG#
! !!€ #vuonjes0#
! !!€ #vu^Onjesa>v#
! !!€ #vuonjasa0v#


"Consonant Gradation for xx:x"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:0 <=> Vow: Cx _ Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
     where Cx in ( t k m n ŋ s r l f j v ) ; !not bb, dd, gg, dtj, dts

     
"Consonant Gradation for xxy:xy"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:0 <=> Vow:+ Cx _ Cy Vow:+ Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
     where Cx in ( b b b b b b d d d d d d f f g g g g j j j j j j j j j j k k k l l l l l l l l l m m m m n n n p r r r r r r r r r s s s s s s t t t t ŋ ŋ ŋ v v v v v v v )
           Cy in ( d j l m n r g j k m n v d n d l ŋ v b d g p k l m r s v n s v j b d f g k p s v b g p s d j s s b d f g j k p s v j k m n p v j k m s g k n d j k l r g s )  
          matched ;

! !!€ Ánnda^WG
! !!€ Án0da0
! 
! !!€ ánnde^WG
! !!€ án0de0

! !!€ stállo^WG
! !!€ stál0o0

! !!€ tjállag^WG^CDEL
! !!€ tjál0a000
! !!€ tjállaga%>v
! !!€ tjállaga0v

          
"Consonant Gradation for xxt(j|s):xt(j|s)" ! ájjte, gájjtsa
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:0 <=> Vow:+ Cx _ t (j:*|s:*) Vow:+ Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
     where Cx in ( b f j k l n p r s v ) ;

"Consonant Gradation for xxsj:xsj" ! ákksjo (kksj llsj mmsj ppsj rrsj vvsj) very similar to "Consonant Gradation for xxt(j|s):xt(j|s)"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:0 <=> Vow:+ Cx _ s j Vow:+ Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
     where Cx in ( k l m p r v ) ;

! !!€ ájjte^WG
! !!€ áj0te0
! !!€ gájjtsa^WG
! !!€ gáj0tsa0
! !!€ gu^Olle^WG
! !!€ guol0e0
! !!€ gu^Olle^WG^IJ>jd
! !!€ gu0l0i000jd

"Consonant Gradation for xy:y"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:0 <=> Vow (Vow:) _ Cy Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ; !Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cy (Vow:+) (Cns:+) ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
     where Cx in ( b d d g )
           Cy in ( m j n ŋ )  
          matched ;

"Delete h in hx:y" ! first step
!! **@RULENAME@**  
h:0  <=> Vow _ Cx: ( [ j | s ] ) Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
    where Cx in (p t k) ;

"Intervocalic voiced plosives in hx:y" ! second step
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:Cy <=> h: _ Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ; ! Cx:Cy <=> h: _ ([Vow:+  (Cns:+)]) ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ;
    where Cx in (p t k)
          Cy in (b d g)
          matched ;

"Consonant Gradation for l/jbm:l/jm" 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
b:0 <=> Vow [l|j] _ m Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ; ! vájbmo, njálbme

"Consonant Gradation for nnjg:njg" 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
n:0 <=> Vow n _ j g Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ; ! skannjga, vannjgat

"Consonant Gradation for vgŋ:vŋ" 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
g:0 <=> Vow v _ n Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ; ! ávgŋot (unsure about this word!)

"Consonant Gradation for rdj:rj" 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
d:0 <=> Vow r _ j Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ; ! girdje<->girje (non-standard variant)

"Consonant Gradation for ldj:lj" 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
d:0 <=> Vow l _ j Vow: Cns:* ( Dummy: ) %^WG: ; ! äldja<->ielja (moose)


!! ## Other consonant rules 
! =====================

"Final C Deletion"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ %^WG: %^CDEL: ;
	where Cx in ( b d g s h ) ; 

!!need to confirm this, then make sure it is functional first! all ODD-classes affected? what about  almatj? what about derived DIM-forms?
!"Final C Deletion for Essive Variant" !svájnas -> svájdnas- -> svájdnan (ess)
!!! __@RULENAME@__  
!Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ %^CDEL: ;
!	where Cx in ( g j l m n r s ) ; ! -tj!


"Final devoicing"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:Cy <=> _ (%^WG:) (%>:) # ;
    where Cx in ( b2 d2 g2 )
          Cy in ( p  t  k )
          matched ; 

! !!€ gål'leg2
! !!€ gål0lek
! !!€ gål'leg2a
! !!€ gål0lega
! !!€ gu^Ossmag2^WG
! !!€ guos0mak0
! !!€ iejgád2
! !!€ iejgát
! !!€ gu^Ossmag2a>v
! !!€ guassmaga0v
! !!€ iejgád2i2>jd
! !!€ iejgád0i0jd
! !!€ mu^Ohttag^WG^CDEL
! !!€ muoht0a000
! !!€ mu^Ohttaga>v
! !!€ muahttaga0v

"Word Final Simplification in -st" !st->s (eg. elat) variation (descriptive, not normative)
!! **@RULENAME@**  
t2:0 <=> s _ .#. ;

! !!€ burist2
! !!€ buris0

"Word-final De-Affricatization for tj" !variation (eg. dim-suffix) (descriptive, not normative) (sj - tj word-finally)
!! **@RULENAME@**  
s:t <=> _ j2: .#. ;

"Word-final reduction for -dtj" 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
d:0 <=> [a|u] (%>:) _ t j (%>:) # ;
!-dtj- is a non-standard variant of -tj-, e.g. såbmelatj<->såbmeladtja, biednagatj<->biednagadtja
!only valid as coda of a final *odd* syllable – only such stems have underlying -dtj-
!in other words: this is dealt with in lexc


! ===========          
!! ## Vowel rules 
! ===========          

!! ###  metaphony

"Default VH" !regressive vowel height assimilation in V1 with i/u in V2" ! á:ä a:i ä:e å:u ^O:0
!! **@RULENAME@**  
	Vx:Vy <=> [#|.#.] Cns:* _ Cns:+ VHtrig Cns:* Dummy:* Vow:* %>:0 ; 
    where Vx in ( á a ä å )
          Vy in ( ä i e u )
          matched ; 
!This requires every root that undergoes inflection to end with a morpheme boundary, even when no suffix exists; this prevents VH in non-final compound stems (since \# wouldn't work). !guolle<->gulij sábme<->sämij båtsoj<->buhtsu (last one w/o morpheme boundary!)

"Default VH for 4syllables" !(ignores first foot, otherwise same as above)
!! **@RULENAME@**  
	Vx:Vy <=> [#|.#.] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ Cns:+ _ Cns:+ VHtrig Cns:* Dummy:* Vow:* %>:0 ; 
    where Vx in ( á a ä å )
          Vy in ( ä i e u )
          matched ; 
!ságastillin, vuosádillin  <- these have to work, too!!


! !!€ ságasti>t
! !!€ ságasti0t
! !!€ ságasta>v
! !!€ ságasta0v

! !!€ #ållol^WG#
! !!€ #ål0ol0#
! !!€ #ållol^V2O2Ua>v#
! !!€ #ullul0a0v#

! !!€ bárdne^WG>0#
! !!€ bárdne000#
! !!€ bárdne^WG^IJ>j#
! !!€ bärdni000j#

! !!€ bähkkum#ståhpo^UAUML#
! !!€ bähkkum#ståhpo0#
! !!€ bähkkum#ståhpo^WG>v#
! !!€ bähkkum#stå0bo00v#
! !!€ bähkku#ståhpo^UAUML#
! !!€ bähkku#ståhpo0#
! !!€ ståhpo^WG>v#
! !!€ stå0bo00v#

! !!€ bajeldis#gárrvo^UAUML#
! !!€ bajeldis#gárrvo0#
! !!€ bajeldis#gárrvo^WG>v#
! !!€ bajeldis#gár0vo00v#
! !!€ gárrvo^WG>v#
! !!€ gár0vo00v#

! !!€ åvvdå#giehtje#
! !!€ åvvdå#giehtje#
! !!€ åvvdå#giehtje^WG#
! !!€ åvvdå#gie0tje0#

! !!€ jievvja^G3
! !!€ j0ävvja0

! !!€ båhtsoj^WG.#.
! !!€ bå0tsoj0.#.
! !!€ båhtsu.#.
! !!€ buhtsu.#.
! !!€ båhtsu%>v.#.
! !!€ buhtsu0v.#.

! !!€ gu^Oksagis#
! !!€ guoksagis#
